District of Columbia statutes.
4-605

Settlement probative of liability.

Any settlement or compromise of a claim or cause of action between a beneficiary and third party for more than what in the opinion of the court is a nominal amount in light of the claims asserted shall be admissible in evidence as probative of that third party’s liability to the District.

June 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-86, § 6, 31 DCR 2098
1981 Ed., § 3-505.